District of Columbia statutes.
5-1001

Attendance of witnesses — Issuance of subpoenas; fees.

Any trial board of the Metropolitan Police force or the Fire Department of the District of Columbia shall have the power to issue subpoenas in the name of the Chief Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to compel witnesses to appear and testify and/or to produce all books, records, papers or documents before said trial board; provided, that witnesses other than those employed by the District of Columbia subpoenaed to appear before said trial board shall be entitled to the same fees as are paid witnesses for attendance before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, but said fees need not be tendered said witnesses in advance of their appearing and testifying and/or producing books, records, papers or documents before said trial board.

May 11, 1892, 27 Stat. 29, ch. 65, § 1
Feb. 20, 1896, 29 Stat. 10, ch. 25, § 1
Apr. 16, 1932, 47 Stat. 86, ch. 118, § 1
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(14)(A)
Insanitary buildings, condemnation, condemnation review board, see § 6-902.
Merit system, Application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
This section is referenced in § 1-632.03, § 5-1002, § 5-1003, and § 6-902.
1981 Ed., § 4-801.
1973 Ed., § 4-601.